Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-218
Certificate; refusal, suspension, or revocation; notice; hearing; powers of board; powers of district court.

The Board of Barber Examiners may not refuse to renew, suspend, or revoke any certificate of registration or approval under the provisions of section 71-217 unless the person accused has been given at least twenty days' notice in writing of the charge against him and a public hearing by the board. Upon the hearing of any such proceeding, the board may administer oaths and may procure, by its subpoena, the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant books and papers. Any district court, or any judge of the district court, either in term time or in vacation, upon application either of the accused or of the board may, by order duly entered, require the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant books and papers before the board in any hearing relating to the refusal, suspension or revocation of certificates of registration or approval.

Laws 1927, c. 163, § 15, p. 433;

C.S.1929, § 71-2019;

R.S.1943, § 71-218;

Laws 1963, c. 409, § 22, p. 1324;

Laws 1978, LB 722, § 13.